Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,108
Grain moisture measuring devices; sections; violations; penalty.

A person who violates sections 89-1,104 to 89-1,108 shall be guilty of a Class IIIA misdemeanor and, if a public employee, such person shall be subject to dismissal.

Laws 1978, LB 636, § 5.